src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON v3_syä  !!≈ * **@CODE@** syä, myä, lyä .#.
+V+Inf:%>ä KK ;
+V+Inf+Err/Orth:y%>ä KK ;
+V+Inf+Err/Orth:y%>jä KK ;
:ö v3_other ;
+V+Pass+Cond:ö%>i3s K ;
+V+InfMa:ö 3infcase_odd ;
+V+InfMa+Ill:öm^HMET2%>h^A^An K ; ! also hm 
+V+Inf+Tra:%>^Akse PxK ;
+V+InfE+Ins:ö%>en K ; ! xxx
+V+InfE+Ine:ö%>ess^A K ;
+V+InfE+Ine:%>ess^A K ;
+V+Pass+InfE+Ine:ö%>ess^A K ; !CHECK


LEXICON v3_jua  !!≈ * **@CODE@** jua, lua, sua, tua .#.
+V+Inf:%>a KK ;
+V+Inf:o%>a KK ;
+V+Inf:o%>ja KK ;
:o v3_other ;
+V+Pass+Cond:o%>i3s K ;
+V+InfMa:o 3infcase_odd ;
+V+InfMa+Ill:om^HMET2%>h^A^An K ; ! also hm 
+V+Inf+Tra:%>^Akse PxK ;
+V+InfE+Ins:o%>en K ;
+V+InfE+Ine:%>ess^A K ;
+V+InfE+Ine:o%>ess^A K ;
+V+Pass+InfE+Ine:%>ess^A K ; !CHECK

LEXICON v3_ja !!≈ * **@CODE@** for inf like saaja
!+V+Inf:%>’^A K ; !not for this group?
+V+Inf:%>^A K ; !OR Use/NG?
+V+InfE+Ine:%>ess^A K ; !OR Use/NG?
+V+InfE+Ine+Err/Orth:%>’ess^A K ;
+V+Pass+InfE+Ine+Err/Orth:%>’ess^A K ; !CHECK
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:%>^Ut K ; !OR Use/NG?
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:%>’^Ut K ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:%>j^Ut K ; !
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:%>^N^N^U K ;
v3_j ; !(f ex inf form -ja)
+V+Pass+Cond:t%>^Ai3s K ;

!LEXICON v3_ja_long
!v3_ja ;
!+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:%>j^Ut K ; !palmikoijut!

LEXICON v3_a !!≈ * **@CODE@** for inf with ’a; saaja
+V+Inf:%>’^A K ;
+V+Inf:%>h^A K ; 
+V+Inf: K ; !saa etc
+V+InfE+Ine:%>’ess^A K ;
+V+InfE+Ine:%>ess^A K ;
+V+Pass+InfE+Ine:%>’ess^A K ; !CHECK
+V+InfE+Ins:%>’en K ; 
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:%>’^Ut K ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:%>^Ut K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:%>^N^N^U K ;
v3_j ;
+V+Pass+Cond:%>i3s K ;

LEXICON v3_ta  !!≈ * **@CODE@** maata
v3_other ;
+V+Pass+Cond:%>i3s K ;
+V+Inf:%>t^A K ; !myytä
+V+Inf:%>ta K ; !myyta
+V+Inf:%>^A K ; !myyä
+V+Pass+InfE+Ine:%>tess^A K ; !CHECK
+V+InfMa:  3infcase_odd ;
+V+InfMa+Ill:%>hm^A^An K ; ! also hm 
+V+Inf+Tra:%>t^Akse PxK ;
+V+InfE+Ine:%>ess^A K ;
+V+InfE+Ins:%>en K ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:%>t^Ut K ;

LEXICON v3_ha !!≈ * **@CODE@** like v3_ja but also inf.form saaHA etc
v3_j ;
+V+Pass+Cond:%>i3s K ;
+V+Inf:%>’^A K ;
+V+Inf:%>h^A K ; 
+V+Inf: K ; 
+V+InfE+Ine:%>’ess^A K ;
+V+Pass+InfE+Ine:%>’ess^A K ; !CHECK
+V+InfE+Ins:%>’en K ; 
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:%>’^Ut K ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:%>j^Ut K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:%>^N^N^U K ;

+V+InfE+Ine:%>ess^A K ;

LEXICON v3_ja_short !!≈ * **@CODE@** like v3_ja but also short inf.form viä etc
+V+Inf:e%>j^A KK ;
+V+Inf:e%>’^A K ;
+V+Inf:%>^A K ;
+V+InfE+Ine:e%>’ess^A K ;
+V+Pass+InfE+Ine:e%>’ess^A K ; !CHECK
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:e%>’^Ut K ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:e%>j^Ut K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:e%>^N^N^U K ;
:e v3_other ;
+V+Pass+Cond:e%>i3s K ;
+V+InfMa+Ill:e%>^HMETAmh^A^An K ; ! 
+V+InfMa+Ine:e%>m^Ass^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ela:e%>m^Ast^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ade:e%>m^Al^A K ; !-la!
+V+InfMa+Abe:e%>m^Att^A K ;

+V+InfMa+Ill:eh%>m^A^An K ; !viehmään en gång
+V+Inf+Tra:e%>j^Akse PxK ;
+V+InfE+Ins:e%>jen K ;
+V+InfE+Ins:e%>’en K ;
+V+InfE+Ine:e%>jess^A K ;
+V+Pass+InfE+Ine:e%>jess^A K ; !CHECK

LEXICON v3_j  !!≈ * **@CODE@** contlex for viejä mfl
+V+Inf:%>j^A KK ;
v3_other ;
!+V+Pass+Cond:%>i3s K ; !moved
+V+InfMa+Ill:%>^HMETAmh^A^An K ; ! 
+V+InfMa+Ine:%>m^Ass^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ela:%>m^Ast^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ade:%>m^Al^A K ; !-la!
+V+InfMa+Abe:%>m^Att^A K ;

+V+InfMa+Ill:h%>m^A^An K ; !viehmään en gång
+V+Inf+Tra:%>j^Akse PxK ;
+V+InfE+Ins:%>jen K ;
!+V+InfE+Ins+Err/Orth:%>’en K ; !should it be here?
+V+InfE+Ins:en K ; 
+V+InfE+Ine:%>jess^A K ;
+V+Pass+InfE+Ine+Err/Orth:%>jess^A K ; !CHECK


LEXICON v3_other !!≈ * **@CODE@** contlex för v3-type (saaja, syöjä)
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>n K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>pi K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>pii K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>m^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>tt^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>v^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:^WG%>th^A^An K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:^WG%>h^A^An K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth:%>v^At K ;
!+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>t K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:^WG%>th^A^An K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:^WG%>h^A^An K ; 
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%>^A K ;

+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>i3n K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>i3t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>i3 K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>i3m^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>i3tt^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>i3t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:%>i3v^A K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:%>i3v^At K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:^WG%>thiin K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt:^WG%>thiin K ;
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:%>t^U K ;

+V+Act+PrsPrc:%>v^A x3 ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:%>t^Av^A K ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>t^Av^At K ;

+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>^N^U K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:%>^N^Ut K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc:%>h^Nee x3_oblique ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc:%>^Nhee x3_oblique ;
!+V+Pass+Cond:%>i3s K ; !moved

+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Sg:%>kh^O^On # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2+Err/Orth:%>kh^A^A # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2:%>k^A^A # ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl3:%>kh^O^Ot # ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: K ;

!+V+Act+Cond:%>i3s 2cond ; 
+V+Act+Cond+Sg1:%>i3s%>in K ; ! 
+V+Act+Cond+Sg2:%>i3s%>it K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Sg3:%>i3s K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl1:%>i3s%>im^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl1+Err/Orth:%>i3s%>imm^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl2:%>i3s%>itt^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:%>i3s%>it K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3:%>i3s%>iv^A K ;
+V+Act+Cond+Pl3+Err/Orth:%>i3s%>iv^At K ;

+V+Der/minen:mi nen ;

+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2:^WG # ; !plus älä (älä anna)
+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2:%>k^O # ; !plus älä (älkää antako)
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>t^U K ; 
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:%>t^Ut K ;
+V+AgPrc:m%>^A K ;


LEXICON v3_kaya  !!≈ * **@CODE@** käyä:kä 
+V+Inf:y%>^A KK ; ! 
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:y%>n K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:y%>t KK ; !TEST 22/4 käytkö>käykkö
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:y%>t K ; !also käytkö
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:y K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:y%>pi K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:y%>pii K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:y%>mä K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:y%>ttä K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:y%>vä K ; ! 
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:y K ; ! 
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:y%>hään K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:y K ;

+V+Act+Ind+Prt:v%>i3^WG v12pers_short ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:v%>i3t K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:v%>i3v^A K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3+Err/Orth:v%>i3v^At K ; 
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:y%>thiin K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:v%>i3 K ;
+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Sg:y%>^N^U K ;
+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2:y # ;
+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2:y%>k^O # ;

+V+Inf+Tra:y%>^Akse PxK ; ! 
+V+Inf+Err/Orth:y%>d^A K ; ! d
+V+InfE+Ine:y%>ess^A K ; 
+V+Pass+InfE+Ine:y%>ess^A K ; !CHECK
+V+InfE+Ins:y%>en K ; 

+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:y%>thään K ; ! 
+V+Pass+Ind+Prs:y%>hään K ; ! 
+V+Pass+Ind+Prt:y%>thiin K ; 

+V+Act+PrsPrc:yv%>^A x3 ;
+V+Pass+PrsPrc:y%>t^A%>v^A x3 ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:y%>^N^U K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:y%>^N^Ut K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:y%>^Nheet K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:y%>^N^HMET2%>heet K ;
+V+Act+PrfPrc:y%>^Nhee x3_oblique ;
!+V+Act+PrfPrc:yn%> PRFPRC_OBL  ;
!+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:y’%>^U%>t K ; 


+V+Act+Cond:v%>i4s 2cond ;
+V+Pass+Cond:y%>t^A%>i4s K ;
+V+Pass+Cond:y%>t^A%>s K ;

+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2:y K   ;
+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2:y%>k^A^A K ;

+V+InfMa+Ine:y%>m^Ass^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ela:y%>m^Ast^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Ill:y%>mh^A^An K ;
+V+InfMa+Ill:ym^HMET2%>h^A^An K ; ! also hm
+V+InfMa+Ade:y%>m^Al^A K ;
+V+InfMa+Abe:y%>m^Att^A K ;
!+V+InfMa:y%>m^A MATONodd ;
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:y%>t^U K ; 
!+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>yt^U K ; !havattu
+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom:y%>t^Ut K ; !havatut
+V+AgPrc:ym^A K ;

+V+Der/minen:ymi nen ;
