src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot !!≈ * **@CODE@** = The verb list 
syä:sy v3_syä ;  
jua:ju v3_jua ;  
viejä:vi v3_ja_short ;
saaja:saa v3_ha ;
saa’a:saa v3_a ;
voija:voi v3_ja ;
naija:nai v3_ja ;
uija:ui v3_ja ;
puija:pui v3_ja ;
lua:lu v3_jua ;
sua:su v3_jua ;
tua:tu v3_jua ;
myä:my v3_syä ;
jääjä:jää v3_ha ;
lyä:ly v3_syä ;
soija:soi v3_ja ;
myyta:myy v3_ta ;
loppuunmyytä:loppuun#myy v3_ta ;
laiminlyä:laimin#ly v3_syä ;
uloslyä:ulos#ly v3_syä ;
käyä:kä v3_kaya ;  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  
kaaveloia:kaaveloi v3_ja ;
aterioia:aterioi v3_ja ;
viuhtoia:viuhtoi v3_ja ;
palmikoija:palmikoi v3_ja ; !Former v3_ja_long
vasikoija:vasikoi v3_ja ; !Former v3_ja_long
haarukoija:haarukoi v3_ja ; !Former v3_ja_long
kapaloija:kapaloi v3_ja ; !Former v3_ja_long
kromeloija:kromeloi v3_ja ; !Former v3_ja_long
kaaveloija:kaaveloi v3_ja ; !Former v3_ja_long
koveloija:koveloi v3_ja ; !Former v3_ja_long
kupuloija:kupuloi v3_ja ; !Former v3_ja_long
salamoija:salamoi v3_ja ; !Former v3_ja_long
puikkaroija:puikkaroi v3_ja ; !Former v3_ja_long
jolkkaroija:jolkkaroi v3_ja ; !Former v3_ja_long
mookaroija:mookaroi v3_ja ; !Former v3_ja_long
koparoija:koparoi v3_ja ; !Former v3_ja_long
veivaroija:veivaroi v3_ja ; !Former v3_ja_long
koperoija:koperoi v3_ja ; !Former v3_ja_long
kompuroija:kompuroi v3_ja ; !Former v3_ja_long
kippuroija:kippuroi v3_ja ; !Former v3_ja_long
tantturoija:tantturoi v3_ja ; !Former v3_ja_long
tentturoija:tentturoi v3_ja ; !Former v3_ja_long
karittoija:karittoi v3_ja ; !Former v3_ja_long
palavoija:palavoi v3_ja ; !Former v3_ja_long
haravoija:haravoi v3_ja ; !Former v3_ja_long
mutikoita:mutikoi v3_ta ; 
ateroita:ateroi v3_ta ; 
metelöijä:metelöi v3_ja ;
kipenöijä:kipenöi v3_ja ;
höperöijä:höperöi v3_ja ;
ikävöijä:ikävöi v3_ja ;
metelöitä:metelöi v3_ta ;
myyä:myy v3_ja ;
